North Dakota statutes. TITLE 52 Social Security
CHAPTER 52-06 Benefits

52-06-01.
Conditions required to be eligible for benefits.

An unemployed individual is eligible to receive benefits with respect to any week only if the bureau finds that:

The individual has made a claim for benefits with respect to such week in accordance with such regulations as the bureau may prescribe;

The individual has registered for work and thereafter continued to complete all assigned services and report to a local office as required in accordance with such regulations as the bureau may prescribe, except that the bureau may, by regulation, waive or alter either or both of the requirements of this subsection as to individuals attached to regular jobs and as to such other types of cases or situations with respect to which it finds that compliance with such requirements would be oppressive, or would be inconsistent with the purposes of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law; provided, that no such regulation shall conflict with section 52-06-03;

The individual is able to work and is available for suitable work and actively seeking work, provided:

That notwithstanding any other provisions in this section, no otherwise eligible individual may be denied benefits for any week because the individual is in training with the approval of the bureau by reason of the application of provisions of this subsection relating to availability for work and to active search for work, or the provisions of subsection 3 of section 52-06-02 relating to disqualification for benefits for failure to apply for, or a refusal to accept, suitable work; and

That no claimant may be considered ineligible in any week of unemployment for failure to comply with this subsection, if the failure is due to an illness or disability not covered by workforce safety and insurance and which occurred after the claimant has registered for work and no work has been offered the claimant which is suitable;

The individual has been unemployed for a waiting period of one week. The executive director may suspend the waiting period during periods of time when federal reimbursement for benefit charges incurred for the suspended waiting period is made available to the bureau. Any suspension of the waiting period applies to all new initial claims filed with an effective date within the time period in which the waiting period is suspended. No week may be counted as a week of unemployment for the purposes of this subsection:

Unless it occurs within the benefit year which includes the week with respect to which the individual claims payment of benefits;

If benefits have been paid with respect thereto; and

Unless the individual was eligible for benefits, with respect thereto as provided in this section and section 52-06-02; and

The individual participates in re-employment services, such as job search assistance services, if the individual has been determined to be likely to exhaust regular benefits and to need re-employment services pursuant to a profiling system established by the bureau, unless the bureau determines that:

The individual has completed these services; or

There is justifiable cause for the claimant’s failure to participate in these services.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 6; 1939, ch. 215, § 6; 1941, ch. 261, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 52-0601; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 6; 1951, ch. 293, § 5; 1957, ch. 328, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 52-0601; S.L. 1971, ch. 475, § 17; 1971, ch. 478, § 1; 1973, ch. 391, §§ 24, 25; 1979, ch. 525, § 1; 1981, ch. 502, § 1; 1983, ch. 537, § 2; 1989, ch. 69, § 57; 1995, ch. 479, § 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2009, ch. 447, § 1; 2021, ch. 44, § 5, effective April 29, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 447, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

52-06-02.
Disqualification for benefits.

An individual is disqualified for benefits:

For the week in which the individual has left the individual’s most recent employment voluntarily without good cause attributable to the employer, and thereafter until such time as the individual:

Can demonstrate that the individual has earned remuneration for personal services in employment from and after the date of the unemployment compensation claim filing, equivalent to at least eight times the individual’s weekly benefit amount as determined under section 52-06-04; and

Has not left the individual’s most recent employment under disqualifying circumstances.

A temporary employee of a temporary help firm is deemed to have left employment voluntarily if the employee does not contact the temporary help firm for reassignment before filing for benefits. Failure to contact the temporary help firm is not deemed a voluntary leaving of employment unless the claimant was advised of the obligation to contact the temporary help firm upon completion of an assignment and advised that unemployment benefits may be denied for failure to contact the temporary help firm. As used in this subsection, “temporary employee” means an employee assigned to work for a client of a temporary help firm; and “temporary help firm” means a firm that hires that firm’s own employees and assigns these employees to a client to support or supplement the client’s workforce in a work situation such as employee absence, temporary skill shortage, seasonal workload, a special assignment, and a special project.

This subsection does not apply if job service North Dakota determines that the individual in an active claim filing status accepted work which the individual could have refused with good cause under section 52-06-36 and terminated such employment with the same good cause and within the first ten weeks after starting work.

This subsection does not apply if the individual left employment or remains away from employment following illness or injury upon a physician’s written notice or order; no benefits may be paid under this exception unless the employee has notified the employer of the physician’s requirement and has offered service for suitable work to the employer upon the individual’s capability of returning to employment. This exception does not apply unless the individual’s capability of returning to employment and offer of service for suitable work to the employer occurs within sixty days of the last day of work. However, the cost of any benefits paid under this exception may not be charged against the account of the employer, other than a reimbursing employer, from whom the individual became separated as a result of the illness or injury. Job service North Dakota may request and designate a licensed physician to provide a second opinion regarding the claimant’s qualification; however, no individual may be charged fees of any kind for the cost of such second opinion.

This subsection does not apply if the individual left the most recent employment because of an injury or illness caused or aggravated by the employment; no benefits may be paid under this exception unless the individual leaves employment upon a physician’s written notice or order, the individual has notified the employer of the physician’s requirement, and there is no reasonable alternative but to leave employment.

For the purpose of this subsection, an individual who left the most recent employment in anticipation of discharge or layoff must be deemed to have left employment voluntarily and without good cause attributable to the employer.

For the purpose of this subsection, “most recent employment” means employment with any employer for whom the claimant last worked and voluntarily quit without good cause attributable to the employer or with any employer, in insured work, for whom the claimant last worked and earned wages equal to or exceeding eight times the individual’s weekly benefit amount.

This subsection does not apply if the individual leaves work which is two hundred road miles [321.87 kilometers] or more, as measured on a one-way basis, from the individual’s home to accept work which is less than two hundred road miles [321.87 kilometers] from the individual’s home provided the work is a bona fide job offer with a reasonable expectation of continued employment.

This subsection does not apply if the individual voluntarily leaves most recent employment to accept a bona fide job offer with a base-period employer who laid off the individual and with whom the individual has a demonstrated job attachment. For the purposes of this exception, “demonstrated job attachment” requires earnings in each of six months during the five calendar quarters before the calendar quarter in which the individual files the claim for benefits.

This subsection does not apply if the reason for separation from the individual’s employment is directly attributable to domestic violence, stalking, or sexual assault that is verified by documentation submitted to job service North Dakota which substantiates the individual’s reason for separation from the most recent employment and such continued employment would jeopardize the safety of the individual or of the individual’s spouse, parent, or minor child. After receiving a claim for unemployment insurance benefits for which the individual identifies domestic violence, stalking, or sexual assault as the reason for separation, job service North Dakota shall notify the most recent employer of the reason for separation provided by the individual.

For purposes of this subdivision, documentation of domestic violence or sexual assault includes:

A court order, protection order, restraining order, or other record filed with a court;

A police or law enforcement record;

A medical record indicating domestic violence or sexual assault; or

A written affidavit provided by an individual who has assisted the claimant in dealing with the domestic violence or sexual assault and who is a:

Licensed counselor;

Licensed social worker;

Member of the clergy;

Director or domestic violence advocate at a domestic violence sexual assault organization as defined in section 14-07.1-01; or

Licensed attorney.

For purposes of this subdivision, documentation of stalking must include:

A police or law enforcement record; and

A written affidavit provided by an individual who has assisted the claimant in dealing with the stalking and who is a:

Licensed counselor;

Licensed social worker;

Member of the clergy;

Director of domestic violence advocate at a domestic violence sexual assault organization as defined in section 14-07.1-01; or

Licensed attorney.

Documentation must be received by job service North Dakota within fourteen calendar days from the date the individual files a claim for unemployment insurance benefits after separating from employment for reasons directly attributable to domestic violence, stalking, or sexual assault.

A false statement of domestic violence, stalking, or sexual assault in a claim for unemployment insurance benefits is subject to subsection 8 and section 52-06-40.

This subsection does not apply if the individual is a military spouse who, after disclosure to the individual’s employer and a reasonable attempt to maintain the employment relationship through accommodation, voluntarily left the most recent employment to relocate because of permanent change of station orders of the individual’s military-connected spouse. For purposes of this subdivision:

“Military spouse” means the spouse of a member of the armed forces of the United States or a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States stationed in this state in accordance with military orders or stationed in this state before a reassignment to duties outside this state.

“Permanent change of station orders” means the assignment, reassignment, or transfer of a member of the armed forces of the United States or a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States from the member’s present duty station or location without return to the previous duty station or location.

For the week in which the individual has been discharged for misconduct in connection with the individual’s most recent employment and thereafter until such time as the individual:

Can demonstrate that the individual has earned remuneration for personal services in employment from and after the date of the unemployment compensation claim filing, equivalent to at least ten times the individual’s weekly benefit amount as determined under section 52-06-04; and

Has not left the individual’s most recent employment under disqualifying circumstances.

If the individual has failed, without good cause, either to accept suitable employment; to apply for suitable employment; or to return to the individual’s customary self-employment, if any, when so directed to do so by the bureau or its authorized representative. Such disqualification must continue for the week in which such failure occurred and thereafter until such time as the individual:

Can demonstrate that the individual has earned remuneration for personal services in employment equivalent to at least ten times the individual’s weekly benefit amount as determined under section 52-06-04; and

Has not left the individual’s most recent employment under disqualifying circumstances.

For any week with respect to which it is found that the individual’s unemployment is due to any kind of labor dispute, including a strike, sympathy strike, or lockout; provided, that this subsection does not apply if it is shown that:

The individual is not participating in or directly interested in the labor dispute; and

The individual does not belong to a grade or class of workers of which, immediately before the commencement of the labor dispute, there were members employed at the premises at which the labor dispute occurs, any of whom are participating in or directly interested in the labor dispute; provided, that if in any case separate branches of work, which are commonly conducted as separate businesses in separate premises, are conducted in separate departments of the same premises, each such department must, for the purpose of this subsection, be deemed to be a separate factory, establishment, or other premises.

For any week with respect to which or a part of which the individual has received or is seeking unemployment benefits under an unemployment compensation law of another state or of the United States; provided, that if the appropriate agency of such state or of the United States finally determines that the individual is not entitled to such unemployment benefits, this disqualification does not apply.

For any week of unemployment if such individual is a student registered for a full-time curriculum at, and is regularly attending, an established school, college, or university, and the scheduled class hours are the same time period or periods as the normal work hours of the occupation from which that individual earned the majority of the wages in that individual’s base period, unless that individual is authorized to receive benefits while in training pursuant to subsection 3 of section 52-06-01. However, this disqualification does not apply to students registered for a full-time curriculum who have earned the majority of the wages in their base periods for services performed during weeks in which the individual was so registered and attending school. As used in this subsection, the term “full-time curriculum” means a course load of twelve or more credit hours or a course load found to be equivalent by rule adopted by job service North Dakota.

For any week in which the individual is partially or totally unemployed by reason of a disciplinary suspension of not more than thirty days by the individual’s employer for misconduct connected with the individual’s employment, and the bureau so finds.

For the week in which the individual has filed an otherwise valid claim for benefits and:

For one year from the date on which a determination is made that such individual has made a false statement for the purposes of obtaining benefits to which the individual was not lawfully entitled. Provided, however, that this disqualification does not apply to cases in which it appears to the satisfaction of job service North Dakota that the false statement was made by reason of a mistake or misunderstanding of law or of facts without fraudulent intent; or

For one year when the individual has been separated from the individual’s last employment because of gross misconduct in connection with work.

Which are based on service performed in an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity for any educational institution, for any week of unemployment commencing during the period between two successive academic years, or during a similar period between two regular but not successive terms, or during a period of paid sabbatical leave provided for in the individual’s contract, if the individual performed such services in the first of such academic years or terms and if there is a contract or a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform services in any such capacity for any educational institution in the second of such academic years or terms. This disqualification does not apply to such services performed by an individual who is in the employ of an elementary or secondary school operated by the federal government or to an individual with respect to services performed in employment other than employment as defined in subdivisions f and g of subsection 17 of section 52-01-01. Except for the provisions of this subsection, benefits based on service in employment as defined in subdivisions f and g of subsection 17 of section 52-01-01 are payable in the same amount, on the same terms, and subject to the same conditions as compensation payable on the basis of other service subject to the North Dakota unemployment compensation law.

Which are based on services performed in any other capacity not described in subsection 9 for any educational institution, for any week which commences during a period between two successive academic years or terms if the individual performed such services in the first of such academic years or terms and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform such services in the second of such academic years or terms. This disqualification does not apply to such services performed by an individual who is in the employ of an elementary or secondary school operated by the federal government or to an individual with respect to services performed in employment other than employment as defined in subdivisions f and g of subsection 17 of section 52-01-01. Except for the provisions of this subsection, benefits based on service in employment as defined in subdivisions f and g of subsection 17 of section 52-01-01 are payable in the same amount, on the same terms, and subject to the same conditions as compensation payable on the basis of other service subject to the North Dakota unemployment compensation law. If compensation is denied to any individual under this subsection and the individual was not offered an opportunity to perform such services for the educational institution for the second of such academic years or terms, that individual is entitled to a retroactive payment of compensation for each week for which the individual filed a timely claim for compensation and for which compensation was denied solely by reason of this subsection.

Which are based on any services described in subsection 9 or 10 for any week which commences during an established and customary vacation period or holiday recess if the individual performs the services in the period immediately before the vacation period or holiday recess, and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform the services in the period immediately following the vacation period or holiday recess.

Which are based on any services described in subsection 9 or 10 if the individual performed the services in an educational institution while in the employ of an educational service agency. The disqualification must be as specified in subsections 9, 10, and 11. For this purpose the term “educational service agency” means a governmental agency or governmental entity which is established and operated exclusively for the purpose of providing such services to one or more educational institutions.

Which are based on service, substantially all of which consists of participating in sports or athletic events or training or preparing to so participate, for any week which commences during the period between two successive sport seasons or similar periods if such individual performed such services in the first of such seasons or similar periods and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services in the later of such seasons or similar periods.

Which are based on service performed by an alien, unless such alien is an individual who was lawfully admitted for permanent residence at the time such services were performed, was lawfully present for purposes of performing such services, or otherwise was permanently residing in the United States under color of law at the time such services were performed, including an alien who was lawfully present in the United States as a result of the application of the provisions of sections 207 and 208 or section 212(d)(5) of the Immigration and Nationality Act.

Any data or information required of individuals applying for benefits to determine whether benefits are not payable to them because of their alien status must be uniformly required from all applicants for benefits.

In the case of an individual whose application for benefits would otherwise be approved, no determination that benefits to such individual are not payable because of the individual’s alien status may be made except upon a preponderance of the evidence.

For any week with respect to which an individual is receiving a pension, including a governmental pension other than federal social security retirement benefits, and any other pension, retirement pay, retired pay, annuity, and any other similar periodic payment under a plan maintained or contributed to by a base-period or chargeable employer as determined under applicable law, unless the weekly benefit amount payable to such individual for such week is reduced, but not below zero:

By the prorated weekly amount of the pension after deduction of three-fourths of the portion of the pension that is directly attributable to the percentage of the contributions made to the plan by such individual for claims filed after June 30, 1985, and by the prorated weekly amount of the pension after deduction of the portion of the pension that is directly attributable to the percentage of the contributions made to the plan by such individual for claims filed after June 30, 1986;

By the entire prorated weekly amount of the pension if subdivision a or c does not apply; or

By one-fourth of the pension if the entire contributions to the plan were provided by such individual, by the individual and an employer, or by any other person that is not a base-period or chargeable employer as determined under applicable law, for claims filed after June 30, 1985, and by no part of the pension if the entire contributions to the plan were provided by such individual, by the individual and an employer, or by any other person that is not a base-period or chargeable employer as determined under applicable law, for claims filed after June 30, 1986.

Except that no otherwise eligible individual may be denied benefits for any week because the individual is in training approved under section 236(a)(1) of the Trade Act of 1974 [19 U.S.C. 2296(a)(1)], nor may such individual be denied benefits by reason of leaving work to enter such training, provided the work left is not suitable employment, or because of the application to any such week in training of provisions in the North Dakota unemployment compensation law, or any applicable federal unemployment compensation law, relating to availability for work, active search for work, or refusal to accept work.

With respect to services to which subdivisions f and g of subsection 17 of section 52-01-01 apply, if the services are provided to or on behalf of an educational institution, benefits are not payable under the same circumstances and subject to the same terms and conditions as described in subsections 9, 10, 11, and 12.

For the purpose of this subsection, “most recent employment” means employment with any employer for whom the claimant last worked and was discharged for misconduct in connection with the claimant’s employment or with any employer, in insured work, for whom the claimant last worked and earned wages equal to or exceeding ten times the claimant’s weekly benefit amount.

A reduction may not be made under this subsection by reason of the receipt of a pension if the services performed by the individual during the base period, or remuneration received for such services, for the employer did not affect the individual’s eligibility for, or increase the amount of, the pension, retirement pay, retired pay, annuity, or similar payment. This limitation does not apply to pensions paid under the Railroad Retirement Act of 1974, or the corresponding provisions of prior law. Payments made under the Railroad Retirement Act of 1974 must be treated solely in the manner specified by subdivisions a, b, and c. A reduction may not be made under this subsection by reason of receipt of federal social security retirement benefits.

For purposes of this subsection, the term “suitable employment” means with respect to an individual, work of a substantially equal or higher skill level than the individual’s past adversely affected employment, as defined for purposes of the Trade Act of 1974, and wages for such work at not less than eighty percent of the individual’s average weekly wage as determined for the purposes of the Trade Act of 1974.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 7, subss. a, b, c, subd. 2(d), (e); 1941, ch. 261, § 5, subss. a, b, c, subd. 2(d) to (k); R.C. 1943, § 52-0602; S.L. 1945, ch. 264, § 7; 1949, ch. 303, § 3; 1953, ch. 297, § 2; 1953, ch. 298, §§ 1 to 3; 1957 Supp., § 52-0602; S.L. 1959, ch. 357, § 1; 1963, ch. 335, § 1; 1967, ch. 373, § 1; 1969, ch. 424, § 1; 1971, ch. 475, §§ 8, 18; 1971, ch. 479, § 1; 1971, ch. 480, § 1; 1977, ch. 459, § 13; 1977, ch. 461, § 2; 1979, ch. 526, §§ 2, 3; 1979, ch. 527, § 1; 1981, ch. 502, § 2; 1981, ch. 503, § 1; 1981, ch. 504, § 1; 1983, ch. 535, § 2; 1983, ch. 537, § 3; 1983, ch. 540, § 1; 1983, ch. 541, § 1; 1985, ch. 544, § 4; 1985, ch. 545, § 1; 1987, ch. 598, § 1; 1987, ch. 599, § 1; 1987, ch. 600, § 1; 1989, ch. 596, § 2; 1989, ch. 605, § 1; 1989, ch. 606, § 1; 1991, ch. 538, § 1; 1997, ch. 422, § 1; 1999, ch. 436, § 1; 2001, ch. 456, § 1; 2003, ch. 440, § 7; 2005, ch. 458, § 2; 2005, ch. 460, § 1; 2009, ch. 448, § 1; 2011, ch. 375, § 3; 2013, ch. 393, § 2; 2015, ch. 355, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 384, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 355, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 393, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 375, S.L. 2011 became effective April 26, 2011, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4 of chapter 375, S.L. 2011.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 448, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

52-06-03.
When benefits payable.

Beginning twenty-four months after the date when contributions first accrued under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law, benefits become payable from the fund. Benefits must be paid through public employment offices in accordance with such regulations as the bureau may prescribe.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 5, subs. a; 1939, ch. 215, § 5; 1941, ch. 261, § 3, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 52-0603; S.L. 1959, ch. 357, § 2.

52-06-04.
Weekly benefit amount — Average annual wage — Average weekly wage — Minimum weekly benefit amount — Maximum weekly benefit amount — Qualifying wage — Insured worker and insured work defined.

The procedures, provisions, and conditions of this section must determine the “weekly benefit amount” of those individuals who establish a benefit year:

For the purpose of this section, the bureau shall each year, on or before the first day of June, determine the average annual wage paid to insured workers and, from that determination, an “average weekly wage”, by the following computation:

An individual’s “weekly benefit amount” is one sixty-fifth, if not a multiple of one dollar to be computed to the next lower multiple of one dollar, of the sum of:

The individual’s total wages for insured work paid during the two quarters of the individual’s base period in which the individual’s wages were the highest; and

One-half of the individual’s total wages for insured work paid during the third highest quarter in the individual’s base period.

To qualify as an insured worker an individual must have been paid wages for insured work in at least two calendar quarters of the individual’s base period totaling not less than one and one-half times the individual’s total wages paid during the quarter of the individual’s base period in which the individual’s wages were the highest. However, the wage credits of an individual earned during the period commencing with the end of the prior base period and ending on the date on which the individual filed a valid claim are not available for benefit purposes in a subsequent benefit year unless, in addition thereto, the individual has subsequently earned wages for insured work in an amount equal to at least ten times the individual’s current weekly benefit amount. Base-period wages used to determine an individual’s monetary eligibility under this subsection, as a result of the following employment, may not exceed ten times the individual’s weekly benefit amount:

Employment by a partnership, if one-fourth or greater ownership interest in the partnership is or during such employment was owned or controlled, directly or indirectly by the individual’s spouse or child, or by the individual’s parent if the individual is under age eighteen, or by a combination of two or more of them.

Employment by a corporation, if one-fourth or more of the ownership interest, however designated or evidenced in the corporation is or during such employment was owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by the individual or by the individual’s spouse or child, or by the individual’s parent if the individual is under age eighteen, or by a combination of two or more of them.

Employment by a limited liability company, if one-fourth or more of the ownership interest, however designated or evidenced in the limited liability company is or during such employment was owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by the individual’s spouse or child, or by the individual’s parent if the individual is under eighteen, or by a combination of two or more of them.

The exceptions in subdivisions a, b, and c do not apply if, at the time of making the claim, the ownership interest described in those subdivisions has been ceded. An ownership interest is ceded within the meaning of this subdivision if:

The appropriate official of the partnership, corporation, or limited liability company has officially filed articles of dissolution, a notice of intent to dissolve, or a notice of termination with the secretary of state, and presents proof of that filing to job service North Dakota;

The appropriate official of the corporation has received a certificate of dissolution from the secretary of state;

The partnership, corporation, or limited liability company has sold or otherwise transferred to uninvolved third parties substantially all the assets of the partnership, corporation, or limited liability company with an intent to end the business operation and terminate or dissolve the partnership, corporation, or limited liability company. As used in this subdivision, “uninvolved third parties” excludes all relatives of the partners, directors, members of a board of governors, or substantial stockholders or holders of a substantial membership interest in a limited liability company; and excludes any corporation, limited liability company, or partnership, in which the relative holds a one-fourth or greater ownership interest. As used in this paragraph, “relative” means the following persons whether related by blood, marriage, or adoption: grandparents, parents, siblings, spouses, children, grandchildren, uncles, aunts, and first cousins; or

Substantially all of the assets of the partnership, corporation, or limited liability company have been legally seized by creditors rendering the business incapable of further operation.

With respect to weeks of unemployment beginning on or after January 1, 1978, wages for insured work shall include wages paid for previously uncovered services. For the purposes of this subsection, the term “previously uncovered services” means services:

Which were not employment as defined in subsection 17 of section 52-01-01 and were not services covered pursuant to section 52-05-03 at any time during the one-year period ending December 31, 1975; and

Which are:

Agricultural labor as defined in subdivision m of subsection 17 of section 52-01-01, or domestic service as defined in subdivision n of subsection 17 of section 52-01-01; or

Services performed by an employee of this state or a political subdivision thereof, as provided in subdivision f of subsection 17 of section 52-01-01, or by an employee of a nonprofit educational institution which is not an institution of higher education, as provided in paragraph 3 of subdivision h of subsection 17 of section 52-01-01; except to the extent that assistance under title II of the Emergency Jobs and Unemployment Assistance Act of 1974 was paid on the basis of such services.

For the purpose of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law, the term “insured worker” means an individual who, with respect to a base period, meets the wage and employment requirements of this chapter and “insured worker” means employment for “employers”.

The total wages reported on contribution reports for the preceding calendar year must be divided by the average monthly number of covered workers, whose number must be determined by dividing by twelve the total covered employment reported on contribution reports for the preceding calendar year, and the quotient obtained by dividing the total wages by the average monthly number of covered workers is the average annual wage; and such quotient must be divided by fifty-two and the amount thus obtained, rounded to the nearest cent, is the “average weekly wage”.

However, if that amount is less than the “minimum weekly benefit amount” the individual is monetarily ineligible for benefits. The “minimum weekly benefit amount” is forty-three dollars. The “maximum weekly benefit amount” is sixty-two percent of the “average weekly wage”, rounded to the next lower multiple of one dollar if not a multiple of one dollar. However, if on October first of any calendar year this state’s average contribution rate is below the nationwide average for the preceding calendar year, the maximum weekly benefit amount is sixty-five percent of the “average weekly wage”, rounded to the next lower multiple of one dollar if not a multiple of one dollar.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 5, subss. b, d; 1939, ch. 215, § 5, subs. a; 1941, ch. 261, § 3, subs. b(1); R.C. 1943, § 52-0604; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 8; 1949, ch. 303, § 4; 1951, ch. 293,§ 1; 1953, ch. 299, § 1; 1955, ch. 304, § 5; 1957 Supp., § 52-0604; S.L. 1959, ch. 357, § 3; 1961, ch. 313, § 3; 1963, ch. 336, § 1; 1973, ch. 394, § 1; 1975, ch. 457, § 5; 1977, ch. 459, § 14; 1979, ch. 528, § 1; 1981, ch. 505, § 1; 1983, ch. 82, § 110; 1983, ch. 537, § 4; 1987, ch. 595, § 4; 1989, ch. 603, § 2; 1991, ch. 539, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 496, § 1; 1999, ch. 437, § 1; 2003, ch. 440, § 8.

52-06-05.
Maximum potential benefits.

Any otherwise eligible individual is entitled during the individual’s benefit year to benefits for the number of times the individual’s weekly benefit amount appearing in the following table on the line which includes the individual’s ratio of total base-period wages to highest quarter base-period wages:

Ratio of Total Base-PeriodWages to High Quarter Times WeeklyBenefit Amount 1.50 to 2.29 12 2.30 to 2.44 14 2.45 to 2.59 16 2.60 to 2.74 18 2.75 to 2.89 20 2.90 to 3.04 22 3.05 to 3.19 24 3.20 or more 26

Click to view

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 5, subs. e; 1939, ch. 215, § 5, subs. c; 1941, ch. 261, § 3, subs. c; R.C. 1943, § 52-0605; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 9; 1951, ch. 293, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 52-0605; S.L. 1959, ch. 357, § 4; 1963, ch. 336, § 2; 1979, ch. 528, § 2; 1983, ch. 537, § 5; 1987, ch. 595, § 5; 1991, ch. 539, § 2; 1993, ch. 496, § 2; 1997, ch. 421, § 2; 1999, ch. 435, § 4.

52-06-06.
Weekly benefit for unemployment.

Each eligible individual who is unemployed with respect to any week must be paid with respect to such week a benefit in an amount equal to the individual’s weekly benefit amount less that part of the wages, if any, payable to the individual with respect to such week which is in excess of sixty percent of the individual’s weekly benefit amount. Such benefit, if not a multiple of one dollar, must be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar. For the purposes of this section, wages are payable with respect to the weeks for which they were reasonably intended to be payable, irrespective of whether services were performed in those weeks.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 5, subs. c; 1939, ch. 215, § 5, subs. b; 1941, ch. 261, § 3, subs. b(2); R.C. 1943, § 52-0606; S.L. 1959, ch. 358, § 1; 1983, ch. 535, § 3; 1989, ch. 597, § 2.